Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 628 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âInstitutional marketing associateâ means any third-party 4 entity that enters into an agreement with a postsecondary 5 educational institution or its intercollegiate athletics 6 program to market or promote the postsecondary educational 7 institution or its intercollegiate athletics program, or to 8 otherwise act on behalf of the postsecondary educational 9 institution or the postsecondary educational institutionâs 10 intercollegiate athletics program. âInstitutional marketing 11 associateâ does not include a regulatory body, postsecondary 12 educational institution, postsecondary educational institution 13 staff member, or their respective officers, directors, 14 managers, owners, or employees. 15 2. âPostsecondary educational institutionâ means an 16 institution of higher education governed by the state board 17 of regents, a community college, or a private postsecondary 18 educational institution in this state. 19 3. âStudent athleteâ means an individual who is eligible 20 to participate in, participates in, or has participated in 21 an intercollegiate sport for a postsecondary educational 22 institution. âStudent athleteâ does not include an individual 23 who is eligible to participate in, participates in, or has 24 participated in a college intramural sport or in a professional 25 sport outside of intercollegiate athletics. 26 4. âThird partyâ means any individual or entity, including 27 any athlete agent, other than a postsecondary educational 28 institution, athletic conference, or athletic association. 29 5. âUnique identifierâ means any of the following developed 30 or adopted for marketing or promotional purposes by a 31 postsecondary educational institution or a third party: 32 a. A seal. 33 b. A logo. 34 c. An emblem. 35 -1- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 14 H.F. 628 d. A motto. 1 e. A special symbol. 2 f. Institutional colors. 3 g. A modifier or descriptor. 4 h. A design. 5 i. A patentable or copyrightable item, material, or 6 information. 7 j. Any other item, material, or information that identifies 8 and is recognizable as unique to such postsecondary educational 9 institution or third party. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Compensation of student 11 athletes ââ professional representation. 12 1. a. (1) A postsecondary educational institution 13 shall not enforce any rule, requirement, standard, or other 14 limitation of an athletic association or athletic conference 15 that prevents a student athlete of that institution from fully 16 participating in intercollegiate athletics without penalty or 17 from earning compensation as a result of the use of the student 18 athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation. 19 (2) A student athleteâs financial aid eligibility, amount, 20 duration, or renewal, or any other benefit for which the 21 student athlete is otherwise eligible, shall not be affected by 22 the student athlete earning compensation from the use of the 23 student athleteâs name, image, or likeness rights, or athletic 24 reputation. 25 b. (1) A postsecondary educational institution shall 26 not interfere with or prevent a student athlete from fully 27 participating in intercollegiate athletics or obtaining 28 professional representation without penalty in relation to 29 contracts or legal matters relating to earning compensation 30 as a result of the use of the student athleteâs name, image, 31 likeness rights, or athletic reputation, including but 32 not limited to representation provided by athlete agents 33 or financial advisors or legal representation provided by 34 attorneys. 35 -2- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 2/ 14 H.F. 628 (2) Representation by athlete agents or financial advisors 1 or legal representation provided by attorneys shall be provided 2 by individuals licensed in this state. Any professional 3 representation agreement must be in writing, be executed by 4 both parties, clearly describe the obligations of the parties, 5 and outline fees for the professional representation. 6 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Financial aid. 7 For purposes of this chapter, financial aid from a 8 postsecondary educational institution in which a student 9 athlete is enrolled shall not be considered compensation for 10 use of the athleteâs name, image, and likeness rights, or 11 athletic reputation. 12 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.4 Limitations on certain 13 contracts. 14 1. A student athlete shall not enter into an apparel, 15 equipment, or beverage contract providing compensation to the 16 athlete for use of the student athleteâs name, image, likeness 17 rights, or athletic reputation if the contract requires the 18 student athlete to display a sponsorâs apparel, equipment, 19 or beverage or otherwise advertise for the sponsor during 20 official team activities if such provisions are in conflict 21 with a provision of the postsecondary educational institutionâs 22 current licenses or contracts. 23 2. A student athlete shall not enter into a contract for 24 compensation for the use of the student athleteâs name, image, 25 likeness rights, or athletic reputation if a postsecondary 26 educational institution determines that a term of the contract 27 conflicts with a term of a contract to which the institution is 28 a party. A postsecondary educational institution may authorize 29 an exception to this subsection in writing. 30 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.5 Assistance by postsecondary 31 educational institutions. 32 A postsecondary educational institution or any officer, 33 director, or employee of such institution, including but 34 not limited to a coach, member of the coaching staff, or 35 -3- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 3/ 14 H.F. 628 any individual associated with the institutionâs athletic 1 department, may identify, create, facilitate, negotiate, 2 support, enable, or otherwise assist with opportunities for 3 a student athlete to earn compensation from a third party, 4 including an institutional marketing associate, for the use 5 of the student athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or 6 athletic reputation, provided that a postsecondary educational 7 institution or individual shall not do any of the following: 8 1. Receive compensation from the student athlete or a 9 third party for facilitating, enabling, or assisting with such 10 opportunities. 11 2. Attempt to influence a student athleteâs choice of 12 professional representation related to such opportunities. 13 3. Attempt to reduce a student athleteâs opportunities from 14 competing third parties. 15 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.6 Disclosure of contracts. 16 Before any contract for compensation for the use of a student 17 athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation, 18 or for professional representation, is executed, and before any 19 compensation is provided to the student athlete in advance of a 20 contract, the student athlete shall disclose the contract to 21 the student athleteâs postsecondary educational institution in 22 a manner prescribed by the institution. 23 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 261K.7 Limitation on compensation by 24 institutions. 25 A postsecondary educational institution or any officer, 26 director, or employee of such institution shall not compensate 27 a student athlete, prospective student athlete, or the family 28 thereof for the use of the student athlete or prospective 29 student athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic 30 reputation, unless otherwise permitted by institutional policy 31 and a collegiate athletics association of which the institution 32 is a member. 33 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 261K.8 Unique identifiers. 34 1. A postsecondary educational institution or a third 35 -4- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 4/ 14 H.F. 628 party shall develop and adopt a process for granting to a 1 student athlete, or to a third party for use with a student 2 athlete, a license to use such institutionâs or third partyâs 3 unique identifiers when earning or attempting to earn 4 compensation from the use of the student athleteâs name, image, 5 likeness rights, or athletic reputation consistent with the 6 institutionâs or third partyâs policies regarding licensing of 7 its unique identifiers. 8 2. A postsecondary educational institution or a third party 9 may charge a reasonable fee for a license to use a unique 10 identifier under this section. 11 3. A postsecondary educational institution or a third 12 party may impose requirements that a student athlete granted 13 a license under this section refrain from using such unique 14 identifier in a manner that the institution or third party in 15 its sole discretion determines does any of the following: 16 a. Is reasonably considered to be inconsistent with the 17 institutionâs or third partyâs values or mission. 18 b. Adversely affects the institutionâs or third partyâs 19 image. 20 c. Negatively impacts or inappropriately reflects upon the 21 reputation or religious, moral, or ethical standards of the 22 institution or third party. 23 d. Violates the institutionâs or third partyâs code of 24 conduct or similar requirements. 25 e. Conflicts with a provision of the institutionâs or third 26 partyâs current licenses or contracts. 27 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 261K.9 Compensation outside of 28 official, mandatory team activities. 29 The terms of a contract of a postsecondary educational 30 institutionâs athletic program shall not prevent a student 31 athlete from receiving compensation for using the student 32 athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation 33 for a commercial purpose when the student athlete is not 34 engaged in official mandatory team activities that are recorded 35 -5- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 5/ 14 H.F. 628 in writing and can be made publicly available upon request. 1 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 261K.10 Confidentiality of contracts. 2 1. The terms of a contract or proposed contract detailing 3 compensation to a student athlete at a public postsecondary 4 educational institution for the use of the student athleteâs 5 name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation shall be 6 considered confidential records under section 22.7 and shall 7 not be available for examination by the public pursuant to 8 section 22.2. 9 2. If a private postsecondary educational institution 10 collects, retains, or maintains the terms of a student 11 athleteâs contract or proposed contract detailing compensation 12 to the student athlete for the use of the student athleteâs 13 name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation, the 14 postsecondary educational institution shall consider such 15 contract terms to be student governed by the federal Family 16 Education Rights and Privacy Act. 17 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 261K.11 Conditions on compensation. 18 Compensation to a student athlete for earning or attempting 19 to earn compensation from the use of such student athleteâs 20 name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation shall not 21 be conditioned on such student athleteâs athletic performance. 22 Persons providing compensation to a student athlete for the 23 use of the student athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or 24 athletic reputation shall have the right to condition payment 25 of that compensation on a student athleteâs attendance at a 26 particular postsecondary educational institution. 27 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 261K.12 Compensation by nonprofit 28 organizations. 29 A nonprofit entity that is exempt from federal income 30 taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 31 Code shall have the right to compensate a student athlete 32 for the commercial use of the student athleteâs name, image, 33 likeness rights, or athletic reputation. 34 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 261K.13 Institutional marketing 35 -6- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 6/ 14 H.F. 628 associates. 1 1. Notwithstanding any rule of an athletic association, 2 athletic conference, or any other organization with authority 3 over varsity intercollegiate athletics, institutional marketing 4 associates shall have the right to compensate a student athlete 5 for the commercial use of the student athleteâs name, image, 6 likeness rights, or athletic reputation. This includes the 7 right to compensate a student athlete for the commercial use 8 of the student athleteâs name, image, or likeness rights in 9 connection with the promotion of athletic events in which the 10 student athlete will or may participate, the promotion of the 11 postsecondary educational institution the student athlete 12 attends, and the promotion of the postsecondary educational 13 institutionâs intercollegiate athletics program. Additionally, 14 an institutional marketing associate shall, in the event that a 15 postsecondary educational institution or its intercollegiate 16 athletics program affirmatively grants a request therefor, 17 have the right to utilize content creation and marketing 18 capabilities of a postsecondary educational institution or 19 the postsecondary educational institutionâs intercollegiate 20 athletics program in connection with services provided for the 21 promotion of athletic events in which a student athlete will or 22 may participate, the postsecondary educational institution, or 23 the institutionâs intercollegiate athletics program. 24 2. Notwithstanding any rule of an athletic association, 25 athletic conference, or any other organization with authority 26 over varsity intercollegiate athletics, a student athlete shall 27 have the right to receive compensation from an institutional 28 marketing associate for the commercial use of the student 29 athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation, 30 in connection with the promotion of athletic events in which 31 the student athlete will or may participate, the promotion of 32 the postsecondary educational institution the student athlete 33 attends, and the promotion of the postsecondary educational 34 institutionâs intercollegiate athletics program, or other 35 -7- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 7/ 14 H.F. 628 matters. 1 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 261K.14 Educational workshops. 2 A postsecondary educational institution that enters into 3 commercial agreements that directly or indirectly require 4 the use of a student athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, 5 or athletic reputation shall offer at least two educational 6 workshops per calendar year that may include topics such 7 as financial literacy, life skills, time management, and 8 entrepreneurship. The educational workshops shall not be 9 offered in the same month and each workshop offered in a 10 calendar year shall be unique and not a repetition of the 11 other workshop offered that year. A postsecondary educational 12 institution shall notify all student athletes of the 13 educational workshops through the distribution of informational 14 materials via electronic mail or other communication methods 15 the institution regularly uses to communicate with student 16 athletes. The educational workshops shall not include any 17 marketing, advertising, referral, or solicitation by providers 18 of financial products or services. 19 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 261K.15 Athletic associations, 20 conferences, or organizations ââ prohibited activities. 21 An athletic association, athletic conference, or any other 22 organization with authority over varsity intercollegiate 23 athletics shall not do any of the following or authorize its 24 member institutions to do so: 25 1. Prevent a student athlete from receiving compensation 26 for the commercial use of the student athleteâs name, image, 27 likeness rights, or athletic reputation under this chapter or 28 penalize a student athlete for doing so. 29 2. Prevent a postsecondary educational institution from 30 participating in varsity intercollegiate athletics or otherwise 31 penalize a postsecondary educational institution as a result 32 of a student athleteâs receipt of compensation for the student 33 athleteâs name, image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation 34 under this chapter. 35 -8- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 8/ 14 H.F. 628 3. Prevent a postsecondary educational institution from 1 establishing agreements with a third-party entity to act on 2 its behalf to identify, facilitate, enable, or support student 3 athlete name, image, and likeness activities. 4 4. Accept a complaint, open an investigation, or take 5 any other adverse action against a postsecondary educational 6 institution or any of its employees for engaging in any 7 activity permitted under this chapter. 8 5. Penalize a postsecondary educational institution because 9 an institutional marketing associate compensates a student 10 athlete for use of the student athleteâs name, image, likeness 11 rights, or athletic reputation, as permitted under this 12 chapter, or if a third party violates the collegiate athletic 13 associationâs rules or regulations with regard to student 14 athlete name, image, or likeness activities. 15 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 261K.16 Civil action ââ remedies. 16 1. A student athlete may bring a civil action against third 17 parties that violate this chapter or that interfere with the 18 student athleteâs earning or attempting to earn compensation 19 from the use of such student athleteâs name, image, likeness 20 rights, or athletic reputation for injunctive relief and actual 21 damages. The court shall award court costs and reasonable 22 attorney fees to a prevailing student athlete. 23 2. A student athlete bringing an action under this chapter 24 shall not be deprived of any protections provided under law 25 with respect to a controversy that arises and shall have the 26 right to adjudicate claims that arise under this chapter. 27 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 261K.17 Applicability to high school 28 students. 29 1. A high school student who competes on an interscholastic 30 athletic team in this state that is sponsored by a public 31 school or by a private school whose students compete against 32 a public schoolâs students may earn or attempt to earn 33 compensation from the use of the studentâs name, image, 34 likeness rights, or athletic reputation as though the student 35 -9- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 9/ 14 H.F. 628 were a student athlete as provided in this chapter, subject to 1 the following: 2 a. A high school student shall have the right to discuss 3 earning or attempting to earn such compensation before signing 4 an athletic letter of intent or other written agreement only 5 when having discussions about potential enrollment with a 6 postsecondary educational institution. 7 b. A high school student shall have the right to earn 8 or attempt to earn such compensation only after signing an 9 athletic letter of intent or other written agreement to enroll 10 in a postsecondary educational institution. 11 2. The discussion of, or earning or attempting to earn, 12 compensation from the use of a high school studentâs name, 13 image, likeness rights, or athletic reputation as provided in 14 this chapter shall not be construed to be a violation of any 15 rule and regulation a high school student and high schools 16 are required to follow to maintain and protect a high school 17 studentâs eligibility to participate in high school athletics 18 in this state. 19 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 261K.18 Limitation of liability and 20 legal settlements. 21 1. A postsecondary educational institutionâs employees, 22 including athletics coaching staff, shall not be liable for any 23 damages to a student athleteâs ability to earn compensation 24 for the use of the student athleteâs name, image, or likeness 25 resulting from decisions or actions routinely taken in the 26 course of intercollegiate athletics. 27 2. A legal settlement shall not permit noncompliance with 28 this chapter. Any such provision is void and unenforceable. 29 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 261K.19 Construction. 30 1. This chapter shall not be construed to qualify a 31 student athlete as an employee of a postsecondary educational 32 institution. 33 2. This chapter does not affect the rights of student 34 athletes under Tit. IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, 20 35 -10- LSB 2365YH (2) 91 je/jh 10/ 14 H.F. 628 U.S.C. Â§1681 et seq. 1 Sec. 20. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to agreements 2 or contracts entered into, modified, or renewed on or after 3 the effective date of this Act. Such agreements or contracts 4 include but are not limited to the national letter of intent, 5 an athleteâs financial aid agreement, commercial contracts in 6 the athlete group licensing market, and athletic conference or 7 athletic association rules or bylaws. 8